Utah statutes.
49-17-402.   Calculation of retirement allowance.
(1)  A retiree under this system shall receive an allowance equal to:
(a)  5% of the final average monthly salary multiplied by the number of years
of service credit, limited to ten years; plus
(b)  2.25% of the final average monthly salary multiplied by the number of
years of service credit in excess of ten years and up to and including 20
years; plus
(c)  1% of the final average monthly salary multiplied by the number of years
of service credit in excess of 20 years.
(2)  Except as modified by cost-of-living adjustments, an allowance under this
system may not exceed 75% of the member's final average monthly salary.
(3)  If the retiree has attained the age of 55 years and has 20 years or more
of service credit, the retiree shall receive an early retirement reduction to
the allowance based on an actuarial calculation assuming a normal retirement
age of 65 years.
